Vermont, session 2025-2026, H264.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4024 is amended to read:
§ 4024. NEGLIGENT SECURE FIREARMS STORAGE
(a)(1) Prohibition. A person who stores or keeps a firearm shall not, within
any premises that are under the person’s custody or control, and who store or
VT LEG #379583 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.264
2025 Page 2 of 5
keep a firearm if the person knows or reasonably should know that a child or
prohibited person is likely to gain access to the firearm, shall be unless the
person stores or keeps the firearm:
(1) separate from ammunition; and
(2) in a locked container or equipped with a tamper-resistant mechanical
lock or other safety device, properly engaged so as to render the firearm
inoperable by any person other than the owner or authorized user.
(b) Penalties. A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be:
(1) fined not more than $100.00;
(A)(2) imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than
$1,000.00, or both, if a child or prohibited person gains access to the firearm
and uses it in the commission of a crime or displays it in a threatening manner;
or
(B)(3) imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than
$5,000.00, or both, if a child or prohibited person gains access to the firearm
and uses it to cause death or serious bodily injury to any person.
(2)(c) This subsection Exceptions. Subsection (a) of this section shall
not apply if:
(A)(1) the firearm is carried by or within such close proximity that it
can be readily retrieved and used by the owner or another authorized user;
VT LEG #379583 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.264
2025 Page 3 of 5
(B)(2) a child or prohibited person accesses the firearm as a result of
an illegal entry; or
(C)(3) a child or prohibited person accesses and uses the firearm
during the course of a lawful act of self-defense or defense of another person;
or
(D) the person stores or keeps the firearm in a locked container or
equipped with a tamper-resistant mechanical lock or other safety device.
(b)(d)(1) Information distribution. At any location where a licensed dealer
conducts firearm sales or transfers, the licensed dealer shall conspicuously
display a sign containing the information required by subdivision (2) of this
subsection in any area where the sales or transfers occur. The sign shall be
posted so that it can be easily viewed by persons purchasing or receiving
firearms, and the sign shall not be removed, obscured, or rendered illegible. If
the location where the sales or transfers occur is the premises listed on the
dealer’s federal firearms license, an additional sign shall be placed at or near
the entrance to the premises.
(2) The sign required by subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be at
least eight and one-half inches high by 11 inches wide and shall contain black
text at least half an inch high against a white background. The sign shall
contain the following text and no other statements or markings:
VT LEG #379583 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.264
2025 Page 4 of 5
“WARNING: Access to a firearm in the home significantly increases
the risk of suicide; death during domestic violence disputes; and the
unintentional death of children, household members, and others. If you or a
loved one is experiencing distress or depression, call the 988 Suicide and Crisis
hotline or text “VT” to 741741.
Vermont law requires gun owners to securely store their firearms
separately from ammunition in their homes and other premises under their
control if a person prohibited from purchasing or possessing firearms or a child
is likely to gain access to them. Failure to securely store firearms as required
by law may result in criminal prosecution. It is important that the owner of a
firearm seek firearm safety instructions from a certified firearms instructor and
keep firearms secured from unauthorized use. Posted pursuant to 13 V.S.A.
§ 4024.”
(c)(e) As used in this section:
(1) “Authorized user” means a person 18 years of age or older who is
not a prohibited person and who has been authorized to carry or use the firearm
by the owner.
(2) “Child” means a person under 18 years of age.
(3) “Firearm” has the same meaning as in subsection 4017(d) of this
title.
VT LEG #379583 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.264
2025 Page 5 of 5
(4) “Licensed dealer” means a person issued a license as a dealer in
firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).
(5) “Locked container” means a box, case, chest, locker, safe, or other
similar receptacle equipped with a tamper-resistant lock.
(6) “Prohibited person” means a person who is prohibited from
possessing a firearm by state or federal law or by court order.
(7) “Serious bodily injury” has the same meaning as in subdivision
1021(a)(2) of this title.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379583 v.1